Hawaii, session 2026, SB2981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that pre-determined minimum parking requirements needlessly drive up the cost of construction, particularly housing construction; discourage walking and multi-modal transit usage; and encourage excessive reliance on automobiles with attendant impacts on human health and greenhouse gas emissions. The legislature further finds that, rather than the counties taking a one-size-fits-all approach to minimum parking requirements, the amount of parking for a project should be determined on a case-by-case basis by permit applicants, sensitive to actual community needs. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to prohibit minimum off-street parking requirements for any new development in an urban district. SECTION 2.  This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Parking Reform and Modernization Act". SECTION 3.  Chapter 205, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§205-    Off-street parking requirements; prohibited; urban district.  Notwithstanding any other law, charter, provision, ordinance, code, or standard to the contrary, beginning July 1, 2027, off-street parking requirements shall be prohibited for any new development in an urban district." SECTION 4.  Section 46-4.7, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (b) to read as follows: "(b) Notwithstanding any law, ordinance, or code or standard to the contrary, each adaptive reuse ordinance shall: (1)  Allow for the construction of micro units; provided that no county shall require a micro unit to be larger than minimum standards established in the International Building Code; (2)  Allow for adaptive reuse to meet the interior environment requirements of the International Building Code; and (3)  Provide for an exemption to any requirements regarding park dedication [or additional off-street parking]; provided that[: (A)  The existing off-street parking satisfies at least fifty per cent of a county's parking requirements; and (B)  The] the building's floor area, height, and setbacks do not change as a result of adaptive reuse[; provided further that this paragraph shall not preclude a county from exempting a project under this section from all off-street parking requirements]." SECTION 5.  Each county shall amend or repeal any charter provision, ordinance, code, standard, or administrative procedure necessary to comply with this Act no later than July 1, 2027.  On July 1, 2027, any charter provision, ordinance, code, standard, or administrative procedure that conflicts with this Act shall be void. SECTION 6.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 4 shall take effect on July 1, 2027. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________